Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 13

Grant Assistance Program for Nursing Home Care

71-5-1301. Creation of grant assistance program.

There is hereby created a grant assistance program to provide financial support for eligible individuals residing in nursing homes licensed by the state, which individuals do not have their nursing home care paid for, in whole or in part, by a federal, state or combined federal-state medical care program.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1.

71-5-1302. Eligibility.

To be eligible to apply for a grant assistance payment under this part, an individual must meet the following qualifications:

The individual must have resided or be residing, after June 30, 1992, in a facility licensed by the state as a nursing home. Residents in facilities certified as intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded are not eligible; and

For each day for which grant assistance is sought, the individual's nursing home care must not have been paid for, in whole or in part, by a federal, state or combined federal-state medical care program.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1.

71-5-1303. Application for payment — Nursing home certification to department.

An application for grant assistance program payments must be made by the individual or such individual's legally authorized representative on forms prescribed by regulations of the department of health. Such forms shall include a certification of the individual's annual income for the calendar year immediately preceding the beginning of the state fiscal year during which grant assistance will be requested, and such certification shall be made by the individual or individual's legally authorized representative.

Following the application, the nursing home shall provide, following the provision of service, but not less than monthly, on forms prescribed by the department, a certification to the department indicating the number of days the individual resided in the nursing home during the preceding month, the per day expense for care at the facility during that period and the source or sources of payment to defray the expense. Application information and monthly certification information is subject to verification by the department.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1; 1993, ch. 425, § 1.

71-5-1304. Processing of applications — Funding — Determination of grant.

Applications shall be processed by the department on a first come, first served basis and are subject to the amount annually appropriated for this program in the general appropriations act. Based on the application, the department shall calculate a projected annual nursing home expense for the individual, which shall be the average per diem nursing home expense for the days claimed times three hundred sixty-five (365) days. The projected annual nursing home expense shall be deducted from the prior year's annual income certified by the patient. The remainder shall be the adjusted annual income for purposes of this grant. The amount of the daily grant shall be determined as follows:

The amount of the payments made pursuant to this part shall be based upon adjusted annual income;

Adjusted annual income for the purposes of determining eligibility must not exceed three hundred fifty percent (350%) of the federal poverty guidelines for an individual as published annually by the United States department of health and human services for determining medicaid eligibility;

Individual payments under this part for adjusted annual incomes ranging from zero dollars ($0.00) to an amount calculated to be one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the individual poverty guidelines is six dollars and fifty cents ($6.50) per day;

Maximum individual payments under this part for adjusted annual incomes ranging from one hundred eighty-six percent (186%) to three hundred fifty percent (350%) of the individual poverty guidelines are not to exceed six dollars ($6.00) per day, as determined by rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of health in order to meet the sums annually appropriated for this program.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1.

71-5-1305. Grant payments.

Grant payments under this part shall be made to the individual monthly and forwarded to such person at the place of such individual's residence. Grant payments are non-assignable and payable only to the individual or such individual's legally authorized representative, which shall not be the nursing home.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1; 1993, ch. 425, § 2.

71-5-1306. Rules and regulations.

The department of health is authorized to promulgate regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as necessary to implement this part. Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate such initial rules as emergency rules pursuant to §4-5-208.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

71-5-1307. [Reserved.]

The department of health is authorized to administer this part, including, but not limited to, the ability to contract with other state agencies or entities to make payments or verify income as required by this part.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1.

71-5-1309. Funding.

This part shall have no application unless funding is specifically provided for and included in the general appropriations act. During any fiscal year, payments under this part shall not exceed the level of funding specifically provided for such purposes within the general appropriations act.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1.

71-5-1310. Total annual income — Certification of income.

The amount of total annual income certified by an individual in order to qualify for a grant pursuant to this part shall include income from all sources. The certification of income by the resident shall be subject to verification by the department in its discretion.

Acts 1992, ch. 954, § 1.

71-5-1311. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.